North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 146-18.
Recreational use of State lakes regulated.

All recreation, except hunting and fishing, in, upon, or above any or all of the State lakes referred to in this Subchapter may be regulated in the public interest by the State agency having administrative authority over these areas.

History.

1933, c. 516, s. 1; G.S., s. 146-8; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-19.
Fishing license fees for nonresidents of counties in which State lakes are situated.

The Wildlife Resources Commission, through its authorized agent or agents, is hereby authorized to require of nonresidents of the county within which a State lake is situated a daily or weekly permit in lieu of the regular “resident State license” for fishing with hook and line or rod and reel within said lake in accordance with the regulations of the Commission relating to said lake. Except for the provisions of this section, the laws and regulations dealing with the issuance of fishing permits by said Commission must be complied with.

History.

1933, c. 516, s. 4; G.S., s. 146-11; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-20.
Forfeiture for failure to register deeds.

All the grants and deeds for swamplands made prior to November 1, 1883, must have been proved and registered, in the county where the lands are situate, within 12 months from November 1, 1883, and every such grant or deed, not being so registered within that time, shall be void, and the title of the proprietor in such lands shall revert to the State; but the provisions of this section shall be applicable only to the swamplands which have been surveyed or taken possession of by, or are vested in, the State or its agencies.

History.

R.S., c. 67, s. 10; R.C., c. 66, s. 10; Code, ss. 2513, 3866; Rev., s. 4046; C.S., s. 7623; G.S., s. 146-96; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-20.1.
Conveyance of certain marshlands validated; public trust rights reserved.

Validation. — All conveyances of swamplands, including regularly flooded estuarine marshlands, that have previously been made by the Literary Fund, the North Carolina Literary Board, or the State Board of Education are declared valid, and the person to whom the conveyance was made or his successor in title is declared to have title to the marshland.

Reservation. — Areas of regularly flooded estuarine marshlands within conveyances validated by subsection (a) remain subject to all public trust rights.

History.

1985, c. 278, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Battle to Preserve North Carolina’s Estuarine Marshes: The 1985 Legislation, Private Claims to Estuarine Marshes, Denial of Permits to Fill, and the Public Trust,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 565 (1986).